Maryland, session 2025, SB0359.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
8–420.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Developmental delays, physical disabilities, or delays in social,
emotional, or behavioral functioning” means:
(i) A significant developmental delay or atypical development, as
identified by a health professional, in:
1. Cognitive development;
2. Physical development;
3. Language and speech development;
4. Psychosocial development; or
– 1 –

Ch. 239 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
5. Self–help skills;
(ii) Psychological trauma, as identified through an evaluation by a
mental health professional; or
(iii) A diagnosed physical, developmental, or mental health condition
that impacts daily living and limits participation in typical early childhood education or
child care settings.
(3) “Program” means the Therapeutic Child Care Grant Program.
(b) There is a Therapeutic Child Care Grant Program in the State.
(c) (1) The purpose of the Program is to provide grants to providers that
specialize in providing child care and early childhood education to children under the age
of 6 years who have developmental delays, physical disabilities, or delays in social,
emotional, or behavioral functioning.
(2) The Department shall administer the Program.
(3) On or before August 15 each year, the Department shall award grants
under this section.
(d) (1) For each of fiscal years 2023 through 2025, AND FOR FISCAL YEAR
EACH OF FISCAL YEARS 2027 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR THEREAFTER THROUGH 2029,
the Governor shall include in the annual budget bill an appropriation of $3,700,000 to the
Program.
(2) In awarding grants under the Program, the Department shall
distribute:
(i) $1,283,000 to existing providers in the same amount as was
provided in fiscal year 2022;
(ii) $1,917,000 to existing providers in the same proportion as was
provided in fiscal year 2022 to provide additional services; and
(iii) Except as provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection, $500,000
to new providers or existing providers to enroll additional children.
(3) If funds are remaining after the distribution required under paragraph
(2)(iii) of this subsection, then the remainder shall be distributed as provided under
paragraph (2)(ii) of this subsection.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 239
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 3 –